Washington statutes.
RCW 2.43.010

Legislative intent.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1174-S2.SL) ***

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to secure the rights, constitutional or otherwise, of persons who, because of a non-English-speaking cultural background, are unable to readily understand or communicate in the English language, and who consequently cannot be fully protected in legal proceedings unless qualified interpreters are available to assist them.

It is the intent of the legislature in the passage of this chapter to provide for the use and procedure for the appointment of such interpreters. Nothing in chapter 358, Laws of 1989 abridges the parties' rights or obligations under other statutes or court rules or other law.

[1989 c 358 s 1. Formerly RCW 2.42.200.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 358: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [1989 c 358 s 10.]